Mississippi, session 2026, HB1076.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Safeguarding American Veteran Empowerment (SAVE) Act of 2026". SECTION 2. (1)  For the purposes of this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings as defined in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a) "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on, or received by, any person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by himself or herself or another. (b) "Veterans' benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function, status, or entitlement for which veterans, their dependents, their survivors, or any other individual are eligible under the laws and regulations administered by the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs or the State Veterans Affairs Board. (c) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, trust, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, or any other legal entity. (2) (a)  A person may not receive compensation for referring any individual to another person to advise or assist the individual with any veterans' benefits matter. (b) A person may not act as a veteran's agent or attorney with respect to a veteran's benefit matter unless such person has been recognized for such purposes by the Secretary of Veterans Affairs. (c)  A person may not receive any compensation for any services rendered in connection with any claim filed within the one (1) year presumptive period of active-duty release, unless the veteran acknowledges by signing a waiver that he or she is within this period and choosing to deny free services available to him or her. (d) A person seeking to receive compensation for advising, assisting, or consulting with any individual in connection with any veterans' benefits matter must, before rendering any services, enter into a written agreement, signed by both parties, which memorializes the specific terms under which the compensation to be paid will be determined.  Compensation must be contingent solely upon securing an increase in benefits awarded, and if successful, compensation cannot exceed five (5) times the amount of the monthly increase in benefits awarded based on the claim.  A person may not charge an initial fee for advising, assisting, or consulting with an individual on a veterans' benefit matter. (e) A person may not guarantee, either directly or by implication, a successful outcome or that an individual is certain to receive specific veterans' benefits or that an individual is certain to receive a specific level, percentage, or amount of veterans' benefits. (f) (i)  Any person who advises, assists, or consults on veterans' benefits matters for compensation must provide the following disclosure at the outset of the business relationship, before entering into a written agreement as described in paragraph (d) of this subsection: "This business is not sponsored by, or affiliated with, the United States Department of Veterans' Affairs, the State Veterans Affairs Board, or any other federally chartered veterans' service organization.  Other organizations including, but not limited to, the State Veterans Affairs Board, a local veterans' service organization, and other federally chartered veterans' service organizations may be able to provide you with this service free of charge.  Products or services offered by this business are not necessarily endorsed by any of these organizations.  You may qualify for other veterans' benefits beyond the benefits for which you are receiving services here." (ii) The written disclosure must appear in at least twelve (12) point type in an easily identifiable place in the person's agreement with the individual seeking services.  The individual must sign the document in which the written disclosure appears to represent his or her understanding of these provisions. The person offering services must retain a copy of the written disclosure while providing veterans' benefits services for compensation to the individual and for at least one (1) year after the date on which the service relations terminate. (g) Persons who advise, assist, or consult on veterans' benefits matters for compensation: (i) May not use a veteran's personal log-in, username, or password information to access that veteran's medical, financial, or government benefits information; and (ii) Must ensure that any individual who has access to veterans' medical or financial information undergoes a background check prior to having access to that information. The background check must be conducted by a reputable source and include identity verification and a criminal records check. (3)  A violation of the provisions of this section constitutes an unfair, false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce under Section 75-24-1, et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.  Each day a violation continues is a separate violation. (4) This section does not apply to, limit, or expand the requirements imposed on agents, attorneys, or other representatives accredited by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and regulated by that agency. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.